Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Chapter 15 Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations

7-15-1.
Definitions.

“Enterprise” includes any sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation, association, or other legal entity, and any union or group of individuals associated for a particular purpose although not a legal entity.

“Person” includes any individual or entity capable of holding a legal or beneficial interest in property.

“Racketeering activity” means any act or threat involving murder, kidnapping, gambling, arson in the first, second, or third degree, robbery, bribery, extortion, larceny or prostitution, or any dealing in narcotic or dangerous drugs that is chargeable as a crime under state law and punishable by imprisonment for more than one year, or child exploitations for commercial or immoral purposes in violation of §

11-9-1(b)

or (c) or §

11-9-1.1

.

“Unlawful debt” means a debt incurred or contracted in an illegal gambling activity or business or that is unenforceable under state law in whole or in part as to principal or interest because of the law relating to usury.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 353, § 1.

7-15-2.
Prohibited activities.

It is unlawful for any person who has knowingly received any income derived directly or indirectly from a racketeering activity or through collection of an unlawful debt, to directly or indirectly use or invest any part of that income, or the proceeds of that income in the acquisition of an interest in, or the establishment or operation of any enterprise.

It is unlawful for any person through a racketeering activity or through collection of an unlawful debt to directly or indirectly acquire or maintain any interest in or control of any enterprise.

It is unlawful for any person employed by or associated with any enterprise to conduct or participate in the conduct of the affairs of the enterprise through racketeering activity or collection of an unlawful debt.

Provided, that a purchase of securities on the open market for purposes of investment and without the intention of controlling or participating in the control of the issuer, or of assisting another to do so, is not unlawful under this section if the securities of the issuer held by the purchaser, the members of his immediate family, and his or her or their accomplices in a racketeering activity or the collection of an unlawful debt after the purchase do not amount in the aggregate to one percent (1%) of the outstanding securities of any one class, and do not, either in law or in fact, confer the power to elect one or more directors of the issuer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 204, § 1.

7-15-3.
Penalties for violations — Disposition of seized property.

Whoever violates this chapter shall be fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or imprisoned not more than ten (10) years, or both, and forfeits to the state:

Any property acquired or maintained in violation of this chapter;

Any property constituting, or derived from, any proceeds that were obtained directly or indirectly from the commission of an offense in violation of this chapter;

Any: (i) Interest in; (ii) Security of; (iii) Claim against; or (iv) Property or contractual right of any kind affording a source of influence over; any enterprise that the person has established, participated in, operated, controlled, or conducted in violation of this chapter; provided that the value of the property forfeited shall not exceed the sum of the money invested in violation of §

7-15-2(a)

plus the appreciated value of the money.

Upon conviction of a person under this chapter, the superior court shall authorize the attorney general to seize all property or other interest declared forfeited under this chapter on any terms and conditions as the court deems proper. The state shall dispose of all property or other interest seized under this chapter as soon as feasible making due provision for the rights of innocent persons. If a property right or other interest is not exercisable or transferable for value by the state it expires and does not revert to the convicted person.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 353, § 1.

7-15-3.1.
Criminal forfeiture procedures.

The attorney general shall set forth with reasonable particularity the property that the attorney general seeks to forfeit pursuant to this chapter.

The court may, upon application of the attorney general, enter a restraining order or injunction, require any person claiming any interest in the subject property to execute a satisfactory performance bond to the state, or take any other action to preserve the availability of property subject to forfeiture described in this section, whether prior or subsequent to the filing of a complaint, indictment, or information. An order entered prior to the filing of a complaint, indictment, or information is effective for not more than ninety (90) days, unless extended by the court for good cause shown for not more than an additional ninety (90) days, or unless a complaint, indictment, or information has been filed during the period.

Written notice and an opportunity for a hearing prior to any action by the court shall be afforded to persons appearing to have an interest in the property. The hearing, however, is to be limited to the issues of whether:

Based on the preponderance of the evidence that the state will prevail on the issue of forfeiture and that failure to enter the order will result in the property being destroyed, conveyed, encumbered or further encumbered, removed from the jurisdiction of the court, or otherwise made unavailable for forfeiture; and

The need to preserve the availability of property through the entry of the requested order outweighs the hardship on any party against whom the order is to be entered.

A temporary restraining order under this section with respect to the property may be entered upon application of the attorney general without notice or opportunity for a hearing when a complaint, information, or indictment has not yet been filed, if the attorney general demonstrates that there is probable cause to believe that the property as to which the order is sought would, in the event of conviction, be subject to forfeiture under this section and that provision of notice will jeopardize the availability of the property for forfeiture. The temporary restraining order expires within ten (10) days of the date on which it is entered, unless extended for good cause shown for not more than an additional ten (10) days, or unless the party against whom it is entered consents to an extension for a longer period.

A hearing requested by any party in interest concerning an order entered under this subsection shall be held at the earliest possible time and prior to the expiration of the temporary order.

The court may receive and consider, at a hearing held pursuant to this subsection, evidence and information that would be admissible under the rules of evidence.

Upon conviction of a person for a violation of this chapter, the court shall enter a judgment of forfeiture to the state of the property described and shall also authorize the attorney general to seize all property ordered forfeited upon any terms and conditions that the court deems proper. Following the entry of an order declaring the property forfeited, the court may, upon application of the attorney general, enter appropriate restraining orders or injunctions; require the execution of satisfactory performance bonds, appoint receivers, conservators, appraisers, accountants, or trustees; or take any other action to protect the interest of the state in the property ordered forfeited. Any income accruing to, or derived from, an enterprise or an interest in an enterprise that has been ordered forfeited under this section may be used to offset ordinary and necessary expenses of the enterprise as required by law and expenses that are necessary to protect the interests of the state or innocent third parties.

All right, title, and interest in property described in this section vests in the state upon the commission of the act giving rise to forfeiture under this act. Any property that is subsequently transferred to any person may be the subject of a special verdict of forfeiture and subsequently shall be ordered forfeited to the state, unless the transferee establishes in a hearing pursuant to subsection (f) that he or she is a bona fide purchaser for value of the property who, at the time of purchase, was reasonably without cause to believe that the property was subject for forfeiture.

Procedures subsequent to the special verdict of forfeiture are as follows:

Following the entry of an order of forfeiture under this section, the state shall publish notice of the order and of its intent to dispose of the property for at least seven (7) successive court days in any manner that the court orders. The state shall also, to the extent practicable, provide written notice to all parties known to have an interest in the property and all parties whose identity is reasonably subject to discovery and who may have an interest in the forfeited property.

Any person, other than the defendant, asserting an interest in property that has been ordered forfeited to the state pursuant to this section may, within one hundred and eighty (180) days of the final publication of notice or his, her, or its receipt of notice as stated in this section, whichever is earlier, petition the court for a hearing to adjudicate the validity of his, her, or its alleged interest in the property. The hearing shall be held by the court without a jury.

The petition shall be signed by the petitioner under penalty of perjury and shall set forth the nature and extent of the petitioner’s right, title, or interest in the property; the time and circumstances of the petitioner’s acquisition of the right, title, or interest in the property; any additional facts supporting the petitioner’s claim; and the relief sought.

The hearing on the petition shall, to the extent practicable and consistent with the interest of justice, be held within thirty (30) days of the filing of the petition. The court may consolidate the hearing on the petition with a hearing on any other petition filed by a person other than the defendant and concerning the same property.

At the hearing, the petitioner may testify and present evidence and witnesses on the petitioner’s own behalf, and cross examine witnesses who appear at the hearing. The state may present evidence and witnesses in rebuttal and in defense of its claim to the property and cross examine witnesses who appear at the hearing. In addition to testimony and evidence presented at the hearing, the court shall consider the relevant portions of the record of the criminal case that resulted in the order of forfeiture.

In accordance with its findings at the hearing, the court shall amend the order of forfeiture if it determines that the petitioner has established by a preponderance of the evidence that the petitioner:

Has a right, title, or interest in the property, and the right, title, or interest was vested in the petitioner rather than the defendant or was superior to any right, title, or interest of the defendant at the time of the commission of the acts which gave rise to the forfeiture of the property under this section;

Is a bona fide purchaser for value of any right, title, or interest in the property and was at the time of purchase reasonably without cause to believe that the property was subject to forfeiture under this chapter; or

Was a victim of the violation of this chapter and is entitled to compensation pursuant to §

7-15-4(c)

, in which case the court shall order the escrow of a sufficient amount to satisfy any judgment that may be obtained in an action brought pursuant to that section.

Following the court’s disposition of all petitions filed under this section, or if no petitions are filed, following the expiration of the period provided in this section for the filing of petitions, the state has clear title to property that is the subject of the order of forfeiture and is able to transfer good and sufficient title to any subsequent purchaser, transferee, or fund as provided in this section.

Except as provided in this section, no party claiming an interest in property subject to forfeiture under this section may:

Intervene in a trial or appeal of a criminal case involving the forfeiture of property; or

Commence any action against the state concerning the validity of the alleged interest in the property subsequent to the filing of a complaint, information, or indictment alleging that the property is subject to forfeiture.

In order to facilitate the identification or location of property declared forfeited and to facilitate the disposition of petitions filed pursuant to this section, after the entry of an order declaring property forfeiture to the state, the court may, upon application of the attorney general or the petitioner, order that the testimony of any witness relating to the property forfeited be taken by deposition and that any designated book, paper, document, record, recording (electronic or otherwise), or other material not privileged be produced at the same time and place and in the same manner as provided for the taking of depositions under the rules of civil procedure.

If any of the property described in this section:

Cannot be located;

Has been transferred to, sold to, or deposited with a third party;

Has been placed beyond the jurisdiction of the court;

Has been substantially diminished in value by any act or omission of the defendant; or

Has been commingled with other property which cannot be divided without difficulty;

the court shall order the forfeiture of any other property of the defendant up to the value of the subject property.

The court has jurisdiction to enter orders as provided in this section regarding property located within this state that may be subject to forfeiture under this chapter or that has been ordered forfeited under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 353, § 2.

7-15-4.
Civil remedies — Actions by attorney general and injured persons.

The superior courts of the state have jurisdiction to prevent and restrain violations of this chapter by issuing appropriate orders, including, but not limited to:

Ordering any person to divest himself, herself, or itself of any interest, direct or indirect, in any enterprise;

Imposing reasonable restrictions on the future activities or investments of any person, including, but not limited to, prohibiting any person from engaging in the same type of endeavor as the enterprise engaged in; or

Ordering dissolution or reorganization of any enterprise, making due provisions for the rights of innocent persons.

The attorney general may institute proceedings under this section. In any action brought by the state under this section, the court shall proceed as soon as practicable to the hearing and determination of the action. Pending final determination of the action, the court may at any time enter any restraining orders or prohibitions, or take any other actions, including the acceptance of satisfactory performance bonds, as it deems proper.

Any person injured in his, her, or its business or property by reason of a violation of this chapter may sue in any appropriate court and shall recover treble damages and the cost of the suit, including a reasonable attorney’s fee. In order for an injured person to recover pursuant to this subsection, it is not necessary to show that the defendant has been convicted of a criminal violation of this chapter.

A final judgment or decree rendered in favor of the state in any criminal proceeding brought by the state under this chapter shall estop the defendant from denying the essential allegations of the criminal offense in any subsequent civil proceeding brought by the state.

In addition to, or in lieu of, the criminal forfeiture procedure of this act, any property described in §

7-15-3

is subject to civil forfeiture pursuant to this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 353, § 1.

7-15-4.1.
Asset forfeiture fund.

Title to all property forfeited pursuant to this chapter, except for that property awarded by the court to the victims of violations of the chapter pursuant to §

7-15-4(c)

, vests in the state of Rhode Island. There is established within the general treasury of the state a special fund to be known as the asset forfeiture fund in which shall be deposited all proceeds of any forfeitures. Where the forfeited property is a vessel, vehicle, aircraft, or other personal property the use of which reasonably relates to law enforcement duties, title to the property may be transferred to the law enforcement agency that seized it. Where the forfeited property is personal property the use of which is not reasonably related to law enforcement duties and where the forfeited property is real estate or an interest in real estate, it shall be sold under the direction of the general treasurer and the proceeds of the sale deposited in the asset forfeiture fund. Where the forfeited property consists of negotiable instruments, securities, or other intangible property, it shall be maintained by the general treasurer as part of the asset forfeiture fund and may be sold at his or her discretion and the proceeds deposited in the fund. Where the forfeited property consists of money, both coin and currency, it shall be deposited in the asset forfeiture fund.

The fund shall be utilized for the following purposes:

The payment of reasonable expenses required for the seizure, management and liquidation of forfeited property and for the reimbursement of federal, state, or local law enforcement agencies for any reasonable expenditures made by them in the performance of the preceding functions;

The payment of awards for information or assistance leading to a civil or criminal proceeding under this chapter, provided that any payment or combination of payments to any one individual or group of individuals in excess of twenty-five hundred dollars ($2,500) from the fund must be approved by the presiding justice of the superior court or an associate justice of the court designated by him or her;

The compromise and payment of claims against property forfeited pursuant to this chapter, provided that any payment in settlement of a claim that is in excess of twenty-five hundred dollars ($2,500) from the fund must be approved by the presiding justice of the superior court or an associate justice of the court designated by him or her;

The payment of twenty-five percent (25%) of the net proceeds of a forfeiture to the Rhode Island law enforcement agency or agencies that accomplished the seizure to be used only for the purposes of future investigations of racketeering activity as defined in these provisions. No law enforcement agency of the state is entitled to keep more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per calendar year under this section. No law enforcement agency of a city or town with a population in excess of twenty thousand (20,000) is entitled to keep more than thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) per calendar year under this section. No law enforcement agency of a city or town with a population of twenty thousand (20,000) or less is entitled to keep more than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) per calendar year under this section.

The attorney general shall report each forfeiture pursuant to this chapter to the general treasurer within thirty (30) days of the issuance of the judgment of forfeiture by the court.

Upon the application of any law enforcement agency of the state of Rhode Island when a special need exists concerning the enforcement of the provisions of this chapter, the attorney general may apply to the presiding justice of the superior court for the release from the general treasury of sums of money not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per investigation. When the presiding justice, upon consideration of the reasons set forth by the agency, deems the funds to be reasonable and necessary to the accomplishment of a goal within the powers and duties of the law enforcement agency, he or she may issue an order ex parte providing for the release of the funds.

The attorney general and the general treasurer shall transmit to the general assembly no later than February 1 of each year, a detailed report on the nature and value of the assets forfeited and their disposition, on the amounts deposited in the fund, and a detailed description of withdrawals from the fund and the uses of the withdrawals, during the previous calendar year, but shall not make any disclosure that would compromise any investigation or prosecution.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 353, § 2.

7-15-5.
Proceedings — Open or closed.

In any proceeding ancillary to or in any civil action instituted by the state under this chapter, the proceedings may be open or closed to the public at the discretion of the court after consideration of the rights of affected persons.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 204, § 1.

7-15-6.
Application.

It is not a defense in any action brought under this chapter that the racketeering activity as defined in §

7-15-1(c)

occurred prior to May 5, 1979.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 346, § 14.

7-15-7.
Investigative demands.

Issuance. Whenever the attorney general has reasonable cause to believe that any person or enterprise has knowledge or is in possession, custody, or control of any documentary material pertinent to an investigation of a possible violation of this chapter, he or she may, prior to and/or following the institution of a civil or criminal proceeding on the violation, issue in writing and cause to be served upon the person or enterprise a civil investigatory demand by which he or she may:

Compel the attendance of the person and require him or her to submit to examination and give testimony under oath; and/or

Require the production of documentary material pertinent to the investigation for inspection and/or copying; and/or

Require answers under oath to written interrogatories.

Power to issue. The power to issue investigative demands does not abate or terminate by reason of the bringing of any action or proceeding under this chapter. The attorney general may issue successive investigatory demands to the same person in order to obtain additional information pertinent to an ongoing investigation.

Confidentiality. In the event the attorney general initiates a civil investigatory demand prior to a criminal indictment for violation of this chapter, then the commencement, contents, and results of the civil investigatory demand is held in the strictest confidence by the attorney general and shall remain so until the time that a civil action is commenced, indictment for violation of this chapter returned, or removal of the confidentiality is ordered by a justice of the superior court.

Contents of investigative demand. Each investigatory demand shall:

State the nature of the conduct constituting the alleged racketeering violation of this chapter that is under investigation and the provisions of law applicable to the conduct;

Prescribe a reasonable return date no less than twenty (20) days from the date of the investigative demand, provided that an earlier date may be prescribed under compelling circumstances;

Specify the time and place at which the person is to appear and give testimony, produce documentary material, and furnish answers to interrogatories, or do any or a combination of the above;

Identify the custodian to whom any documentary material is to be made available;

Describe by class any documentary material to be produced with such definiteness and certainty as to permit the material to be fairly identified;

Contain any interrogatories to which written answers under oath are required; and

Advise in writing the person upon whom the demand is served that the material or statements may constitute a basis for prosecution against the person.

Prohibition against unreasonable demand. No investigatory demand shall:

Contain any requirement that would be unreasonable or improper if contained in a subpoena or a subpoena duces tecum issued by a court of this state; or

Require the disclosure of any material that would be privileged from disclosure if demanded by a subpoena or a subpoena duces tecum issued by a court of this state.

Service of investigative demand.

An investigative demand may be served by:

Delivering an executed copy to the person to be served, or if the person is not a natural person, to any partner, executive officer, managing agent, general agent, or to any agent of the person authorized by appointment or by law to receive service of process on behalf of the person;

Delivering an executed copy to the principal office or place of business of the person to be served; or

Mailing by certified mail, return receipt requested, an executed copy addressed to the person to be served, or if the person is not a natural person, addressed to its principal office or place of business in this state, or if it has none in this state, to its principal office or place of business.

A verified return by the individual serving any demand or petition setting forth the manner of service is prima facie proof of service. In the case of service by certified mail, the return shall be accompanied by the return post office receipt of delivery of the demand.

Authorization to examine. The examination of all persons pursuant to this section shall be conducted by the attorney general or a representative designated in writing by him or her, before an officer authorized to administer oaths in this state. The statements made shall be taken down stenographically or by a sound recording device and shall be transcribed.

Rights of persons served with investigative demands. Any person required to attend and give testimony or to submit documentary material pursuant to this section is entitled to retain, or, on payment of lawfully prescribed cost, to procure, a copy of any document he or she produces and of his or her own statements as transcribed. Any person compelled to appear under a demand for oral testimony pursuant to this section may be accompanied, represented, and advised by counsel. Counsel may advise the person in confidence, either upon the request of the person or upon counsel’s own initiative, with respect to any question asked of the person. The person or counsel may object on the record to any question, in whole or in part, and shall briefly state for the record the reason for the objection. An objection may properly be made, received, and entered upon the record when it is claimed that the person is entitled to refuse to answer the question on grounds of any constitutional or other legal right or privilege, including the privilege against self incrimination. The person shall not otherwise object to or refuse to answer any question, and shall not by him or herself or through counsel interrupt the oral examination. If the person refuses to answer any question, the attorney general may petition the superior court for an order compelling the person to answer the question. The information and materials supplied to the attorney general pursuant to an investigative demand are not permitted to become public or be disclosed by the attorney general or his or her employees beyond the extent necessary for legitimate law enforcement purposes pursuant to this chapter.

Witness expenses. All persons served with an investigative demand, other than those persons whose conduct or practices are being investigated or any officer, director, or person in the employment of the person under investigation, are paid the same fees and mileage as paid witnesses in the courts of this state. No person is excused from attending the inquiry pursuant to the mandate of an investigative demand or from giving testimony, or from producing documentary material or from being required to answer questions on the ground of failure to tender or pay a witness fee or mileage, unless demand for the witness fee or mileage is made at the time testimony is about to be taken and unless payment of the witness fee or mileage is not made.

Custody of documents.

The attorney general shall designate, from within the department of attorney general, an investigator to serve as racketeer document custodian and any racketeering investigators that he or she determines are necessary to serve as deputies to that officer.

Any person on whom any demand issued under this section has been served shall make the material available for inspection and copying or reproduction to the custodian designated in the demand at the principal place of business of the person, or at any other place that the custodian and the person subsequently agree and prescribe in writing or as the court may direct, pursuant to this section on the return date specified in the demand, or on any later date that the custodian may prescribe in writing. The person may, upon written agreement between the person and the custodian, substitute copies of all or any part of the material for originals of the materials.

The custodian to whom any documentary material is delivered shall take physical possession of it, and is responsible for its use and for its return pursuant to this chapter. The custodian may cause the preparation of any copies of the documentary material that are required for official use under regulations that are promulgated by the attorney general. While in the possession of the custodian, no material produced shall be available for examination, without the consent of the person who produced the material, other than for legitimate law enforcement purposes pursuant to this chapter. Under any reasonable terms and conditions that the attorney general prescribes, documentary material while in the possession of the custodian shall be available for examination by the person who produced the material or any authorized representatives of the person.

Whenever any attorney has been designated to appear on behalf of the state before any court or grand jury in any case or proceeding involving any alleged violation of this chapter, the custodian may deliver to the attorney any documentary material in the possession of the custodian that the attorney determines to be required for use in the presentation of the case or proceeding on behalf of the state. Upon the conclusion of any case or proceeding, the attorney shall return to the custodian any documentary material withdrawn that has not passed into the control of the court or grand jury through its introduction into the record of the case or proceeding.

Upon the completion of the investigation for which any documentary material was produced under this chapter, and any case or proceeding arising from the investigation, the custodian shall return to the person who produced the material all the material, other than copies of it made by the custodian pursuant to this section, that has not passed into the control of any court or grand jury through its introduction into the record of the case or proceeding.

When any documentary material has been produced by any person under this chapter, and no case or proceeding arising from it has been instituted within a reasonable time after completion of the examination and analysis of all evidence assembled in the course of the investigation, the person is entitled, upon written demand made upon the custodian, to the return of all documentary material. Provided, that no documentary material shall be tendered, delivered, or made available to any other state, federal, or municipal agency.

Anyone who knowingly and willfully violates the provision of this subdivision shall, in addition to any civil liability, be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) and/or imprisonment for no longer than one year.

In the event of the death, disability, or separation from service of the custodian of any documentary material produced under any demand issued under this chapter or the official relief of the custodian from responsibility for the custody and control of the material, the attorney general shall promptly designate another racketeering investigator to serve as custodian of the documentary material, and transmit notice in writing to the person who or that produced the material as to the identity and address of the designated successor. Any designated successor has all duties and responsibilities as to the materials imposed by this chapter on his or her predecessor in office as to them, except that he or she is not responsible for any default or dereliction that occurred before his or her designation as custodian.

Enforcement of investigative demands for production. Whenever any person fails to comply with any civil investigative demand served upon him or her under this chapter requiring the production of documentary material, or whenever satisfactory copying or reproduction of that material cannot be done, and the person refuses to surrender the material, the attorney general may file in the superior court and serve upon the person a petition for an order of the court for the enforcement of the demand.

Refusal of persons served to testify or produce documents. Whenever any natural person neglects or refuses to attend and give testimony or to answer any lawful inquiry or to produce documentary material if in his or her power to do so in obedience to an investigative demand served upon him or her under this chapter, he or she may be adjudged in civil contempt by the superior court until any time that he or she purges him or herself of contempt by testifying, producing documentary material, or presenting written answers as ordered. Any natural person who commits perjury or false swearing in response to an investigative demand pursuant to this section is punishable pursuant to the provisions of chapter 33 of title 11.

Motion to quash. Within twenty (20) days after the service of an investigatory demand upon any person, or at any time before the return date specified in the demand, whichever period is shorter, the person served may file in the superior court and serve upon the custodian a petition for an order of the court modifying or setting aside the demand. The time allowed for compliance with the demand in whole or in part as deemed proper and ordered by the court shall not run during the pendency of the petition in the court. The petition shall specify each ground upon which the petitioner relies in seeking relief, and may be based on any failure of the demand to comply with the provisions of this chapter or on any constitutional or other legal right or privilege of the person.

Right of persons producing documents. At any time during which any custodian is in custody or control of any documentary material delivered by any person in compliance with an investigatory demand, the person may file in the superior court and serve upon the custodian a petition for an order of the court requiring the performance by the custodian of any duty imposed upon him or her by this chapter.

Duty to testify.

If, in any investigation brought by the attorney general pursuant to this section, any individual refuses to attend or to give testimony or to produce documentary material or to answer a written interrogatory in obedience to an investigative demand or under order of court on the ground that the testimony or material required of him or her may tend to incriminate him, that person may be ordered to attend and to give testimony or to produce documentary material or to answer the written interrogatory, or to do an applicable combination of these. The above order is an order of court given after a hearing in which the attorney general has established a need for the grant of immunity, as subsequently provided.

The attorney general may petition the presiding justice of the superior court for an order as described in subdivision (1) of this subsection. The petition shall set forth the nature of the investigation and the need for the immunization of the witness.

Compelled testimony shall not be used against the witness as evidence in any criminal proceedings against him or her in any court. However, the grant of immunity does not immunize the witness from civil liability arising from the transactions about which testimony is given, and he or she may nevertheless be prosecuted or subjected to penalty or forfeiture for any perjury, false swearing, or contempt committed in answering or in failing to answer or in producing evidence or failing to do so in accordance with the order. If a person refuses to testify after being granted immunity from prosecution and after being ordered to testify, he or she may be adjudged in civil contempt by the superior court until any time that he or she purges him or herself of contempt by testifying, producing documentary material or presenting written answers as ordered. The above does not prevent the attorney general from instituting other appropriate contempt proceedings against any person who violates any of the above provisions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 204, § 1.

7-15-8.
Jurisdiction.

The superior court has jurisdiction to hear and determine all matters arising under this chapter and to enter any orders that may be required to implement the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 204, § 1.

7-15-9.
Remedies cumulative.

The criminal sanctions and civil remedies provided for in this chapter are cumulative of each other and of existing powers and remedies which are provided for by statute or are inherent in the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 204, § 1.

7-15-10.
Construction.

The provisions of this chapter shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purpose.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 204, § 1.

7-15-11.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter is held unconstitutional, this decision does not affect the validity of the remainder of the chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 204, § 1.